Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 63 O.S. 2021, Sections 1-729a, 1-
729.1, 1-729.2, 1-729.3, 1-729.4, 1-729.5, 1-729.6, 1-729.7, 1-756,
1-756.1, 1-756.2, 1-756.3, 1-756.4, 1-756.5, 1-756.6, 1-756.7, 1-
756.8, 1-756.9, 1-756.10, 1-756.11, 1-756.12, 1-756.13, 1-756.14, 1-
757.1, 1-757.2, 1-757.3, 1-757.4, 1-757.5, 1-757.6, 1-757.7, 1-
757.8, 1-757.9, 1-757.10, 1-757.11, 1-757.12, 1-757.13, 1-757.14, 1-
757.15, and 1-757.16, are hereby repealed.
HB1169 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.


















HB1169 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.